Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 4

Qualifications and Registration — Engineers

62-2-401. General provisions.

The following shall be considered as minimum evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant is qualified for registration as an engineer:

Graduation from Approved Engineering Curriculum, Experience and Examination. A graduate of an engineering curriculum of four (4) years or more, approved by the board as being of satisfactory standing, and with a specific record of four (4) years or more of progressive experience on engineering projects of a grade and character that indicates to the board that the applicant may be competent to practice engineering, and passed an examination prepared by the National Council of Examiners for Engineering and Surveying involving the fundamentals of engineering, shall be admitted to an examination prepared by the National Council of Examiners for Engineering and Surveying in the principles and practice of engineering. Upon passing the examination, the applicant shall be granted a certificate of registration to practice engineering in this state; provided, that the applicant is otherwise qualified; or

Long Established Practice. A graduate of an approved engineering curriculum of four (4) years or more, with a specific record of twelve (12) years or more of progressive experience on engineering projects of a grade and character that indicates to the board that the applicant may be competent to practice engineering shall be admitted to an examination prepared by the National Council of Examiners for Engineering and Surveying, in the principles and practice of engineering. Upon passing the examination, the applicant shall be granted a certificate of registration to practice engineering in this state; provided, that the applicant is otherwise qualified.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, the board may in its discretion grant up to one (1) year of qualified experience obtained in an established cooperative education program that is carried out within the framework of an approved engineering curriculum and that has been approved by the board.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 10; 1980, ch. 627, § 6; T.C.A., § 62-210; Acts 1990, ch. 1026, §§ 21, 22; 1993, ch. 132, §§ 3-5; 1995, ch. 113, § 1; 1997, ch. 129, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 215, § 1; 2013, ch. 180, § 1; 2017, ch. 226, § 1; 2017, ch. 348, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2017, ch. 344, § 2 provided that the act, which amended this section by adding (a)(4) [now (a)(3)], shall take effect July 1, 2017, and is repealed on June 30, 2019, provided that any applicant satisfying the qualifications established pursuant to the act and who is registered as an engineer shall maintain such registration.

Former (a)(3) read as follows: “A person who holds a master's degree in engineering from an institution with an ABET accredited engineering program approved by the board as being of satisfactory standing, and with a specific record of twenty (20) years or more of progressive experience on engineering projects of a grade and character that indicates to the board that the applicant is competent to practice engineering and who has passed the Fundamentals of Engineering Examination administered by the National Council of Examiners for Engineering and Surveying (NCEES) shall be admitted to an examination prepared by the NCEES, in the principles and practice of engineering. Upon passing the examination, the applicant shall be granted a certificate of registration to practice engineering in this state if the applicant is otherwise qualified.”

Cross-References. Occupation tax on engineers, title 67, ch. 4, part 17.

Qualification and registration generally, title 62, chapter 2, part 3.

Law Reviews.

When the Earth Moves and Buildings Tumble, Who Will Pay? — Tort Liability and Defenses for Earthquake Damage within the New Madrid Fault Zone, 22 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (1991).

62-2-402. Engineer intern.

The following shall be considered as minimum evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant is qualified for registration as an engineer intern: a graduate in a curriculum of four (4) years or more leading to a baccalaureate degree in engineering and approved by the board as of satisfactory standing or who is a prospective graduate in good standing in the senior year in such a curriculum, and who passes an examination prepared by the National Council of Examiners for Engineering and Surveying involving the fundamentals of engineering; provided, that the applicant is of good character and repute.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 11; 1980, ch. 627, § 7; T.C.A., § 62-211; Acts 1990, ch. 1026, § 21; 1993, ch. 132, § 6; 1995, ch. 113, §§ 1, 4; 2013, ch. 180, § 2.

Cross-References. Prescribed application forms and fees, § 62-2-404.

62-2-403. Teaching as engineering experience.

Engineering teaching with full-time faculty status in a college or university offering an approved engineering curriculum of four (4) years or more may be considered, at the discretion of the board, as engineering experience.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 12; T.C.A., § 62-212.

62-2-404. Application form — Fees.

Application for registration as a professional engineer or certification as an engineer intern shall be on a form prescribed and furnished by the board, shall contain statements made under oath showing the applicant's education and a detailed summary of the applicant's technical experience and shall contain references, none of whom may be members of the board.

The initial application fee shall be established by the board and shall accompany the application.

The application fee for engineer intern certification or enrollment shall be established by the board and shall accompany the application.

The registration fee shall be established by the board and shall be paid upon approval of the application.

Should the board deny the issuance of a certificate to any applicant, the application fee shall be retained by the board.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 13; T.C.A., § 62-213; Acts 1990, ch. 1026, § 21; 1993, ch. 132, § 7; 1995, ch. 113, § 1; 1998, ch. 612, § 1; 2013, ch. 180, § 3; 2015, ch. 291, § 3.

62-2-405. Examinations.

The examinations will be held at times and places that the board directs. The board shall determine the acceptable grade on examinations.

Written examinations will be given in two (2) sections as follows:

Engineering Fundamentals. Consists of a National Council of Examiners for Engineering and Surveying prepared examination on the fundamentals of engineering. Passing this examination qualifies the examinee for an engineer intern certificate; provided, that the examinee has met all other requirements for certification required by this chapter; and

Principles and Practices of Engineering. Consists of a National Council of Examiners for Engineering and Surveying examination on applied engineering. Passing this examination qualifies the examinee for registration as a professional engineer; provided, that the examinee has met the other requirements for registration by this chapter.

A candidate failing an examination may apply for reexamination.

Acts 1979, ch. 263, § 14; T.C.A., § 62-214; Acts 1990, ch. 1026, § 21; 1993, ch. 132, §§ 8, 9; 1995, ch. 113, §§ 1, 5; 2013, ch. 180, § 4; 2015, ch. 291, §§ 4, 5.

62-2-406. Engineers born prior to 1928 exempt from continuing education requirements.

Any continuing education requirements established pursuant to this chapter shall provide that engineers who were born prior to January 1, 1928, shall be exempt from complying with continuing education standards and requirements.

Acts 1998, ch. 754, § 2; 1999, ch. 131, § 1.